Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2770.01
Income tax; return; extension; provisions effective after January 1, 1969.

The provisions of sections 77-2768 and 77-2770 shall become operative for all taxable years commencing on and after January 1, 1969.

Laws 1969, c. 692, § 3, p. 2687.